Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-103
Nebraska State Historical Society; publications.

The reports, addresses and papers mentioned in section 82-102 shall be published at the expense of the state and distributed as other similar official reports are distributed. The state and society shall decide upon a reasonable number of the published reports, which shall be furnished to the society for its use and distribution.

Laws 1883, c. 95, § 3, p. 341;

R.S.1913, § 7168;

C.S.1922, § 6819;

C.S.1929, § 82-103;

R.S.1943, § 82-103.